Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0951.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4. (1) A supplier of water shall file with the department the plans and specifications of the entire for any proposed waterworks system that will be owned or operated by the supplier , unless the department determines that its existing records are adequate. and be issued a construction permit by the department in accordance with this section. A supplier of water shall provide a general plan of the waterworks system for each public water supply shall be provided to the department by a supplier of water and shall be updated update the general plan as determined necessary by the department. (2) Upon On receipt of the plans and specifications for a proposed waterworks system under subsection (1), the department shall evaluate the adequacy of the proposed system to protect the public health by supplying and supply water meeting that meets the state drinking water standards. and, if If applicable, the department shall evaluate the impact of the proposed system as provided in subsections (3) and (4). In addition, for a proposed waterworks system by a community supply that will provide capacity for a new or increased large quantity withdrawal, the department shall utilize the assessment tool to evaluate the proposed withdrawal associated with the proposed waterworks system and shall confirm the assessment tool's determination. Prior to Before the implementation of the assessment tool under section 32706a of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.32706a, the department shall evaluate the proposed withdrawal based upon on reasonably available information. If the department determines that the proposed withdrawal for a community supply is a zone C withdrawal, the community supply shall certify that it is implementing applicable environmentally sound and economically feasible water conservation measures prepared under section 32708a of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.32708a, that the community supply considers to be reasonable, or the community supply shall certify that it is implementing environmentally sound and economically feasible water conservation measures developed for the water use associated with that specific withdrawal that the community supply considers to be reasonable. The department shall also conduct a capacity assessment for a proposed community supply or nontransient noncommunity water supply and determine if the system has the technical, financial, and managerial capacity to meet all the requirements of this act and the rules promulgated under this act, on the date of commencement of operations commence. If upon on evaluation the department determines the plans and specifications to be are inadequate or the capacity assessment shows the system to be is inadequate, the department may return the plans and specifications to the applicant and require additions or modifications as may be the department determines is appropriate. The department may reject plans and specifications for a waterworks system that will not satisfactorily provide for the protection of the public health or, if applicable, will not meet the standards provided in subsection (4). The department may deny a permit for construction of a proposed community supply or a nontransient noncommunity water supply if the capacity assessment shows that the proposed system does not have adequate technical, financial, or managerial capacity to meet the requirements of this act and the rules promulgated under this act. (3) The department shall evaluate the impact of a proposed waterworks system for a community supply that will do any of the following: (a) Provide new total designed withdrawal capacity of more than 2,000,000 gallons of water per day from the waters of the state. (b) Provide an increased total designed withdrawal capacity of more than 2,000,000 gallons of water per day from the waters of the state beyond the system's total designed withdrawal capacity. (c) Provide new or increased total designed withdrawal capacity for a new or increased large quantity withdrawal of more than 1,000,000 gallons of water per day from the waters of the state to supply a common distribution system that the department confirms is a zone C withdrawal. (d) Provide new total designed withdrawal capacity or an increased total designed withdrawal capacity that will result in an intrabasin transfer of more than 100,000 gallons per day average over any 90-day period. (4) The Before the department issues a construction permit under this section, the department shall provide public notice that it the department is conducting an evaluation under subsection (3) and shall provide a public comment period of not less than 45 days before making a determination on that the evaluation. The department shall reject the plans and specifications under subsection (1) and not issue a construction permit for a proposed waterworks system evaluated under subsection (3) if it the department determines that the proposed system will not meet the applicable standard provided in section 32723 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.32723. However, the department may approve the plans and specifications provided under subsection (1) and issue a construction permit for a proposed waterworks system evaluated under subsection (3) for a community supply owned by a political subdivision that the department determines will not meet the applicable standard provided in section 32723 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.32723, if the plans and specifications do not result in an intrabasin transfer of more than 100,000 gallons per day average over any 90-day period and both of the following conditions are met: (a) The department determines that there is no feasible and prudent alternative location for the withdrawal. (b) The department includes in the approval conditions related to depth, pumping capacity, rate of flow, and ultimate use that ensure that the environmental impact of the withdrawal is balanced by the public benefit of the withdrawal related to public health, safety, and welfare. This subdivision does not confer upon give the department any the authority to require a person to connect or to remain connected to an existing drinking water supply system owned by a political subdivision. (5) The department's approval of a proposed waterworks system construction permit under this section shall be considered to satisfy satisfies the requirements of section 4.11 of the compact. (6) Before commencing the beginning construction of a waterworks system or an alteration, addition, or improvement to a system, a supplier of water shall submit the plans and specifications under subsection (1) for the improvements to the department and secure from the department a construction permit for construction as provided by rule. Plans and specifications submitted to the department shall must be prepared by a professional engineer licensed under article 20 of the occupational code, 1980 PA 299, MCL 339.2001 to 339.2014. A contractor, builder, or supplier of water shall not engage in or begin the construction of a waterworks system or an alteration, addition, or improvement to a waterworks system until a valid construction permit for the construction has been secured from is issued by the department under this section. A contractor, builder, or supplier of water who permits or that allows construction to proceed without a valid construction permit, or in a manner not in accordance with the plans and specifications approved by the department, violates this act. A supplier of water shall not issue a voucher or check or in any other way expend money or provide consideration for construction of a waterworks system unless a valid construction permit is issued by the department. is in effect. The department may issue a construction permit with conditions to correct minor design deficiencies. If eligible, a supplier may request an expedited review of an application for a construction permit under section 4a. A construction permit issued under this section does not expire. (7) The department may deny a construction permit for construction of a waterworks system or an alteration, addition, or improvement to a waterworks system if the most recent capacity assessment shows that the waterworks system does not have adequate technical, financial, or managerial capacity to meet the requirements of this act and the rules promulgated under this act, and the deficiencies identified in that capacity assessment remain uncorrected, unless the proposed construction will remedy the deficiencies. The department may deny a construction permit of a proposed community supply or a nontransient noncommunity water supply if the capacity assessment shows that the proposed system does not have adequate technical, financial, or managerial capacity to meet the requirements of this act and the rules promulgated under this act. (8) The department may verbally approve minor modifications of a construction permit issued by the department as a result of unforeseen site conditions that become apparent during construction. Minor modifications include, but are not limited to, extending a hydrant lead or routing a water main around a manhole. A supplier making that makes a request for a modification shall provide to the department all relevant information required under this section and the application form provided by the department related to the modification. A supplier shall obtain written approval from the department for all modifications to a waterworks system except when the department provides verbal approval for a minor modification as provided for in this subsection. A supplier receiving that receives a written or verbal approval from the department shall submit revised plans and specifications to the department within not later than 10 days from after the date of approval. (9) If a supplier seeks confirmation of the department's verbal approval of a minor modification under subsection (8), the supplier shall notify the department electronically, at an address specified by the department, with a detailed description of the request for the modification. The department shall make reasonable efforts to respond within 2 business days, confirming whether the request has been is approved or not approved. If the department has not responded within 2 business days after the department receives the detailed description, the verbal approval shall be is considered confirmed. (10) As a condition of a construction permit issued by the department under this section, to a community supply , the department shall require the permit holder to annually submit a report by April 1 of each year to the department a report by April 1 of each year that contains the information described in section 32707 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.32707. (11) As used in this section, "assessment tool", "compact", "intrabasin transfer", "new or increased large quantity withdrawal", "waters of the state", and "zone C withdrawal" mean those terms as they are defined in section 32701 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.32701. Sec. 17. (1) A person engaged in producing that produces bottled drinking water shall utilize a water source meeting that meets the requirements of this section and the requirements otherwise provided in this act. Bottling or and packaging facilities and their operation shall remain under the supervision of the department of agriculture as provided for in and rural development in accordance with the food law, of 2000, 2000 PA 92, MCL 289.1101 to 289.8111. (2) A person producing that produces bottled drinking water from an out-of-state source shall submit to the department for approval proof to the director that the source of the water and bottling facilities were approved by the agency having that has jurisdiction. The director department may withhold approval of the bottled water under this subsection if the other agency's inspection, surveillance, and approval procedures and techniques are determined to be inadequate. (3) A person who that proposes to engage in producing bottled drinking water from a new or increased large quantity withdrawal of more than 200,000 gallons of water per day from the waters of the state or that will result in an intrabasin transfer of more than 100,000 gallons of water per day average over any 90-day period shall submit an application for a water withdrawal permit to the department, in on a form required and in a manner prescribed by the department, containing that contains an evaluation of environmental, hydrological, and hydrogeological conditions that exist and the predicted effects of the intended withdrawal that provides a reasonable basis for the a determination under this section to be made. (4) The department shall only approve an application under subsection (3) issue a water withdrawal permit only if the department determines both of all of the following: (a) A completed application is submitted under subsection (3). (b) (a) The proposed use water withdrawal or intrabasin transfer will meet the applicable standard provided in section 32723 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.32723. (c) (b) The person will undertake activities, if needed, to address hydrologic impacts commensurate with the nature and extent of the withdrawal. These activities may include those related to the stream flow regime, water quality, and aquifer protection. (5) Before proposing activities under subsection (4)(b), (4)(c), the person proposing to engage in producing bottled drinking water that submits an application for a water withdrawal permit under subsection (3) shall consult with local government officials and interested community members. (6) Before making the determination the department issues a water withdrawal permit under subsection (4), the department shall provide public notice and an opportunity for public comment of for not less than 45 days. (7) If the person proposing to engage in producing bottled drinking water submits an application for a water withdrawal permit under subsection (3) does and the person has not have been issued a construction permit under section 4, the person shall request a determination submit an application for a water withdrawal permit under subsection (3) and request the department issue the water withdrawal permit under subsection (4) when that the person applies for a the construction permit under section 4. If the person proposing to engage in producing bottled drinking water has previously received a permit under section 4, the person shall obtain approval under subsection (4) prior to beginning the operations. A proposed use for which the department makes a determination that the conditions of subsection (4) will be met shall be considered to satisfy The department's issuance of a water withdrawal permit under subsection (4) satisfies the requirements of section 4.11 of the compact. (8) A person seeking a departmental determination under subsection (4) shall submit an application fee of $5,000.00 to the department. The department shall transmit application fees received under this section to the state treasurer to be credited to the water use protection fund created in section 32714.water withdrawal permit issued under subsection (4) does not expire. (9) Beginning January 1, 2027, a person shall not produce bottled drinking water unless the person is licensed by the department in accordance with this subsection and subsections (10) to (13). A person that applies for a license shall do so on an application and in a manner prescribed by the department. The applicant shall include all of the following with an application for a license: (a) A water withdrawal permit issued under subsection (4). (b) A copy of the construction permit issued under section 4. (c) Any other permits required under federal law. (d) Any other information required by the department. (e) An application fee in the amount of $6,000.00. The department shall transmit application fees received under this subsection to the state treasurer to be credited to the water use protection fund created in section 32714 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.32714. (10) Not later than 30 days after the department receives a completed license application under subsection (9), the department shall do all of the following: (a) Provide public notice of the application for a license. (b) Accept public comments for not less than 45 days. Public comments must be submitted to the department on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department. (c) If requested by a local unit of government or federally recognized tribe, meet and consult with the local unit of government or federally recognized tribe not later than 15 days after a request is made. A request under this subdivision must be submitted to the department on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department. (d) Hold at least 1 public hearing on the license application. The department shall provide notice as required under the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275, of the time and place of the public hearing. (11) The department shall approve or deny an application for a license not later than 90 days after the requirements under subsection (10) are completed. The department shall issue a license only if the department determines all of the following requirements are met: (a) The application is complete. If the application is incomplete, the department shall notify the applicant in writing not later than 30 days after the application is received, and state the deficiency and request additional information. (b) The applicant is in compliance with the terms and conditions of a permit issued under subsection (4), and any permits required under federal law. (c) There is sufficient data and information to evaluate the environmental impacts of the proposed water withdrawal on the water source, watershed, and water distribution system. (d) A license issued under this section will not interfere with or impair public trust resources and uses. (12) If the department denies an application for license, the department shall notify the applicant of the denial within 90 days and state the reasons for the denial. If the department denies an application for a license, the applicant may appeal the denial by submitting a written request for a hearing to the department. The applicant must submit the request to the department not more than 15 days after the date of the denial. The department shall conduct a hearing requested under this section in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (13) A license issued under this section is valid for 5 years from the date of issuance and is nontransferable. (14) A license is not required under this section for any of the following: (a) The production of a product that contains or incorporates water obtained from a private well or waterworks system. (b) The withdrawal, treatment, distribution, or delivery of water or the provision of services offered by a public or private water utility, public water supply, or waterworks system. (c) The sale of water obtained from a private well or waterworks system in a glass bottle or other container incidental to a wholesale or retail business. (d) The use of water for agriculture, manufacturing, generation of electricity, or industrial purposes. (15) (9) This section shall not be construed as affecting, intending to affect, or in any way altering or interfering does not affect, alter, or interfere with common law water rights or the applicability of any other laws providing law that provides for the protection of natural resources or the environment. (16) (10) A person who proposes to engage in producing that produces bottled drinking water and who submitted an application for a permit under section 4 prior to the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection before July 9, 2008 is subject to the provisions of this section that existed on February 28, 2006. (17) (11) As used in this section, "compact", "intrabasin transfer", "new or increased large quantity withdrawal", and "waters of the state" mean those terms as they are defined in section 32701 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.32701. Sec. 17a. A person that is licensed under section 17 shall pay a royalty equal to 25 cents per gallon of water that is bottled. Quarterly, a person that is licensed under section 17 shall remit to the department the royalties and a report that documents the total volume of water withdrawn per month and the total volume of water that is used for bottled drinking water per month. A royalty collected by the department under this section must be deposited in the Michigan water trust fund created in section 1205 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.1205. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01434'25) or House Bill No. ____ (request no. H01434'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.